Utah statutes.
77-19-4.   Special release from city or county jail -- Conditions and
limitations.
(1)  All released prisoners under Section 77-19-3 are in the custody of the
custodial authority and are subject at any time to being returned to jail, for
good cause.
(2)  The judge may order that the prisoner:
(a)  pay monies earned from employment during the jail term to those persons
he is legally responsible to support; or
(b)  retain sufficient money to pay his costs of transportation, meals, and
other incidental and necessary expenses related to his special release.
(3)  The custodial authority of the jail shall establish all other conditions
of special release.
(4)  During all hours when the prisoner is not serving the function for which
he is awarded release time, he shall be confined to jail.
(5)  The prisoner shall obtain his own transportation to and from the place
where he performs the function for which he is released.
